Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Regulation of Accountants.

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision relating to a person who, on January 1, 2008, holds a current permit for individual or general practice issued under this chapter to continue to operate under authority of the permit until renewed under the provisions of this chapter as amended by ch. 16, SLA 2006, see § 55(a), ch. 16, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 08.04.350.
Registration of offices. [Repealed, § 12 ch 62 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 08.04.360.
Supervision required.

Each office established or maintained in this state for the practice of public accounting shall be under the direct supervision of an individual in residence who holds a license or a practice privilege. The supervisor may be a sole proprietor, partner, principal, member, or staff employee. A supervisor may serve in this capacity at one office only.

History.

(§ 9(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 20 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in the first sentence, deleted “in residence” following “an individual”, and substituted “issued under this chapter” for “or a practice privilege” at the end, rewrote the third sentence, which read, “A supervisor may serve in this capacity at one office only.”

Sec. 08.04.360.
Supervision required.

Each office established or maintained in this state for the practice of public accounting shall be under the direct supervision of an individual who holds a license issued under this chapter. The supervisor may be a sole proprietor, partner, principal, member, or staff employee. A supervisor may serve in this capacity for each office in the state that is maintained by a firm.

History.

(§ 9(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 20 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 11 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.370.
Use of title “certified public accountant” by office of legal entity.

The title “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” may not be used in connection with an office of a legal entity holding a permit or an out-of-state exemption unless the supervision requirement of AS

08.04.360

is satisfied.

History.

(§ 9(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 13 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, substituted “firm” for “legal entity” following “an office of a” and deleted “or an out-of-state exemption” following “holding a permit”.

Sec. 08.04.370.
Use of title “certified public accountant” by office offirm.

The title “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” may not be used in connection with an office of a firm holding a permit unless the supervision requirement of AS

08.04.360

is satisfied.

History.

(§ 9(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 13 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.380.
Waiver of requirements.

The board may waive the requirements of AS

08.04.240(a)(4)

, (b)(5), and (d)(5),

08.04.360

, and

08.04.370

if

the community has a population of 2,000 or less; and

the individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity that opens or maintains the office maintains another office in the state that meets the requirements outlined in AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

.

History.

(§ 9(4) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 7 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 14 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Sec. 08.04.380.
Waiver of requirements.

History.

[§ 9[4] ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 7 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 14 ch 67 SLA 2010; Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 08.04.390.
Permit for individual practice as a public accountant. [Repealed, § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 08.04.400.
Permit for partnership, limited liability company, or corporate practice as a public accountant. [Repealed, § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 08.04.410.
Inactive license for person not engaged in practice.

Notwithstanding AS

08.04.105

or

08.04.195

, an individual holding a license who is not engaged in the practice of public accounting may maintain the license in good standing by notifying the board that the individual is inactive and paying the required fee.

History.

(§ 10(4) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For certificates and licenses, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 4, art. 6.

Sec. 08.04.420.
Practice privileges.

Except as limited by (b) of this section, an individual who does not have a license in this state, but who is licensed to practice public accounting in another state and whose principal place of business for the practice of public accounting is in the other state may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under a practice privilege if the state in which the individual is licensed to practice public accounting

requires as a condition of licensure that an individual

have at least 150 semester hours of college education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university;

achieve a passing grade on the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination; and

possess at least one year of experience, which includes providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills; the experience may be obtained through practice with the government, industry, colleges, universities, or the public; or

does not require as a condition of licensure that an individual satisfy the requirements of (1) of this subsection, but the individual’s qualifications are substantially equivalent to the requirements of (1) of this subsection; however, for the purposes of this paragraph, the education of an individual who holds a valid license to practice public accounting that is issued by another state before January 1, 2013, and who passes the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination before January 1, 2013, is exempt from the education requirement identified in (1)(A) of this subsection.

Unless the individual is a sole practitioner, if an individual who engages in the practice of public accounting under a practice privilege under (a) of this section performs designated functions for a client whose home office is in this state, the individual may only provide the designated functions through a legal entity that has a permit.

An individual who may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under (a) or (b) of this section is not required to provide a notice to the board, to pay a fee to the board, or to submit documentation to the board in order to engage in the practice of public accounting in this state. The person may engage in the practice of public accounting by mail, by telephone, by electronic means, or in person.

History.

(§ 10(5) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 15 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For certificates and licenses, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “Except as limited by (b) of this section,” and made a related change; repealed (b); in (c), deleted “or (b)” following “this state under (a)”.

Sec. 08.04.420.
Practice privileges.

An individual who does not have a license in this state, but who is licensed to practice public accounting in another state and whose principal place of business for the practice of public accounting is in the other state may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under a practice privilege if the state in which the individual is licensed to practice public accounting

requires as a condition of licensure that an individual

have at least 150 semester hours of college education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university;

achieve a passing grade on the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination; and

possess at least one year of experience, which includes providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills; the experience may be obtained through practice with the government, industry, colleges, universities, or the public; or

does not require as a condition of licensure that an individual satisfy the requirements of (1) of this subsection, but the individual’s qualifications are substantially equivalent to the requirements of (1) of this subsection; however, for the purposes of this paragraph, the education of an individual who holds a valid license to practice public accounting that is issued by another state before January 1, 2013, and who passes the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination before January 1, 2013, is exempt from the education requirement identified in (1)(A) of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

An individual who may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under (a) of this section is not required to provide a notice to the board, to pay a fee to the board, or to submit documentation to the board in order to engage in the practice of public accounting in this state. The person may engage in the practice of public accounting by mail, by telephone, by electronic means, or in person.

History.

(§ 10(5) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 15 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 13 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 14 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.421.
Out-of-state permits and exemptions.

A legal entity that does not have an office in this state, that is authorized to practice public accounting in another state, and that performs designated functions for a client whose home office is located in this state may not engage in the practice of public accounting in this state unless the legal entity has an out-of-state permit. To obtain an out-of-state permit, the legal entity shall submit to the board

a written notice on a form provided by the board;

the fee required by the board;

verification of the current authorization of the legal entity to practice public accounting in the other state; and

verification that the legal entity participates in a quality review program comparable to the program required of entities registered under AS

08.04.426

.

A legal entity that performs designated services but not designated functions for a client whose home office is located in this state may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under an out-of-state exemption if the legal entity

does not have an office in this state;

is authorized to practice public accounting in another state;

performs the designated services through an individual with a practice privilege; and

participates in a quality review program comparable to the program required under AS

08.04.426

.

A legal entity that does not have an office in this state, is authorized to practice public accounting in another state, and does not perform designated functions or designated services for a client whose home office is located in this state may engage in the practice of public accounting in this state under an out-of-state exemption if the services that the legal entity performs within the practice of public accounting are performed

through an individual who has a practice privilege; and

only to the extent that the legal entity can lawfully perform the services in the state where the individual with a practice privilege has the individual’s principal place of business.

If the board denies an out-of-state permit to a legal entity under (a) of this section, the board shall provide notice of the denial to the legal entity.

Notwithstanding AS

08.01.100(b)

, the board shall establish by regulation the period for which an out-of-state permit authorized by (a) of this section is valid. However, the initial term of an out-of-state permit may not exceed three years. The board may renew an out-of-state permit and shall establish by regulation the terms for and length of a renewal, except that the length of a renewal for an out-of-state permit may not exceed four years.

A legal entity who may engage in the practice of public accounting under an out-of-state exemption is not required to provide a notice to the board, pay a fee to the board, or submit documentation to the board. The person may engage in the practice of public accounting by mail, by telephone, by electronic means, or in person.

In this section, “designated service” means

a review of a financial statement, if the performance of the review is established by the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services; or

a compilation service.

History.

(§ 16 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Sec. 08.04.421.
Out-of-state permits and exemptions.

History.

[§ 16 ch 67 SLA 2010; Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 08.04.422.
Conditions of practice privileges, out-of-state permits, and out-of-state exemptions.

An individual with a practice privilege who engages in the practice of public accounting in the state under the practice privilege, a legal entity with a permit or exemption under AS

08.04.421

who engages in the practice of public accounting in this state under the permit or exemption, and a legal entity that hires an individual with a practice privilege shall

consent to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

agree to comply with this chapter, including the regulations adopted by the board;

agree that the individual or legal entity will stop offering to engage or engaging in the practice of public accounting, whether individually or on behalf of a legal entity, if the license from the state of the individual’s or legal entity’s principal place of business becomes invalid; and

consent to the appointment of the state board that issued the individual’s license as the individual’s or legal entity’s agent for service of process in a court action or in another proceeding against the individual or legal entity that arises out of a transaction or an operation connected with or incidental to the individual’s or legal entity’s engagement in the practice of public accounting.

History.

(§ 16 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in the introductory language, substituted “that” for “or exemption under AS

08.04.421

who” following “with a permit”, deleted “under the permit or exemption” following “in this state”, substituted “firm” for “legal entity”, or similar, throughout the section.

Sec. 08.04.422.
Conditions of practice privileges.

An individual with a practice privilege who engages in the practice of public accounting in the state under the practice privilege, a firm with a permit that engages in the practice of public accounting in this state, and a firm that hires an individual with a practice privilege shall

consent to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

agree to comply with this chapter, including the regulations adopted by the board;

agree that the individual or firm will stop offering to engage or engaging in the practice of public accounting, whether individually or on behalf of a firm, if the license from the state of the individual’s or firm’s principal place of business becomes invalid; and

consent to the appointment of the state board that issued the individual’s license as the individual’s or firm’s agent for service of process in a court action or in another proceeding against the individual or firm that arises out of a transaction or an operation connected with or incidental to the individual’s or firm’s engagement in the practice of public accounting.

History.

(§ 16 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 15 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.423.
Competency requirement after licensing.

If, at any time after receiving a license, a licensee decides to perform attest functions, the licensee shall meet the competency requirements established by the board by regulation.

History.

(§ 25 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 4, art. 1.

Sec. 08.04.425.
Continuing education.

The board shall by regulation prescribe requirements for continuing education for individuals with licenses under this chapter. In adopting these regulations, the board may

use and rely upon guidelines and pronouncements with respect to continuing education issued by recognized educational and professional associations in the field; and

prescribe content, duration, and organization of courses or programs that will satisfy the continuing education requirements.

Each application for renewal of a license to practice as a certified public accountant by an individual who has held a license as a certified public accountant for two years or more shall be accompanied or supported by documents or other evidence indicating satisfaction of the continuing education requirements prescribed by the board during the two years immediately preceding the application.

Failure by an applicant for renewal of a license to furnish the evidence required under (b) of this section constitutes grounds for revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the license under AS

08.04.450

unless the board determines that failure to have been due to reasonable cause or excusable neglect. However, the board may renew a license despite failure to furnish evidence of satisfaction of the continuing education requirements established under (a) of this section if the applicant agrees to follow a particular program or schedule of continuing education prescribed by the board.

In adopting regulations under (a) of this section, or in issuing individual orders under (c) of this section, the board

shall consider

the accessibility of applicants to the continuing education courses or programs that it may require; and

any impediments to interstate practice of public accounting that may result from differences in continuing education requirements prescribed by other states; and

may relax or suspend the continuing education requirements

for applicants who certify that they do not intend to engage in the practice of public accounting; or

in instances of individual hardship.

History.

(§ 12 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 26 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 4, art. 6.

Sec. 08.04.426.
Quality review.

The board may require as a condition for renewal of a license or a permit that the applicant for the renewal undergo a quality review conducted as required by the board by regulation.

The quality review under (a) of this section must include verification that the reviewing individual meets the competency requirements set out in the professional standards established by the board for the services. In this subsection, “reviewing individual” means the individual who is responsible for supervising and signing off on or authorizing another individual to sign off on attest functions performed by the applicant.

The board shall adopt the regulations under (a) of this section in a reasonable time before the regulations are scheduled to become effective.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section may require that

an applicant demonstrate that the applicant has undergone a quality review that is a satisfactory equivalent to the quality review under (a) of this section;

the quality reviews be subject to supervision by an oversight body established or approved by the board;

the quality reviews be operated and the documents be maintained in a manner that is designed to preserve confidentiality; and

the board or another person, except for the oversight body authorized by (2) of this subsection, may not access the documents furnished or generated in the course of the quality review.

An oversight body required by (d)(2) of this section shall

periodically report to the board on the effectiveness of the quality review program it is supervising; and

provide the board with a list of the applicants who have participated in a quality review program that is satisfactory to the board.

History.

(§ 12 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 27 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For quality review, see 12 AAC 4, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (a), substituted “renewal provide evidence of enrollment in a peer review program approve by the board” for “renewal undergo a quality review conducted as required by the board”; repealed (b); in (c), inserted, “and (f), following “under (a)”; in (d), in the introductory language, inserted “or (f)” following “under (a)”, in (d)(1), twice substituted “peer review” for “quality review”, in (d)(2), substituted “administration of a peer review be subject to oversight” for “quality reviews be subject to supervision” near the beginning, in (d)(3), substituted “a peer review be performed” for “the quality reviews be operated” at the beginning, rewrote (d)(4), which read, “the board or another person, except for the oversight body authorized by (2) of this subsection, may not access the documents furnished or generated in the course of the quality review”; repealed (e);
added (f).

Sec. 08.04.426.
Quality review.

The board may require as a condition for renewal of a license or a permit that the applicant for the renewal provide evidence of enrollment in a peer review program approved by the board by regulation.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

The board shall adopt the regulations under (a) and (f) of this section in a reasonable time before the regulations are scheduled to become effective.

The regulations adopted under (a) or (f) of this section may require that

an applicant demonstrate that the applicant has undergone a peer review that is a satisfactory equivalent to the peer review under (a) of this section;

the administration of a peer review be subject to oversight by an oversight body established or approved by the board;

a peer review be performed and the documents be maintained in a manner that is designed to preserve confidentiality; and

organizations administering peer review programs provide information requested by the board.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

The board shall, not more frequently than once every three years, require as a condition for renewal of a permit of a firm that the applicant firm undergo a peer review conducted as required by the board by regulation. The peer review must include verification that an individual who practices at the firm, including an individual who is responsible for supervising attest function services in the firm, and who signs or authorizes another person to sign the accountant’s report on a financial statement on behalf of the firm, meets competency requirements established by the board. The regulations must

include reasonable provision for compliance by a firm showing that it has, within the preceding three years, undergone a peer review acceptable to the board that is substantially equivalent to the peer review required in (d) of this section;

require, for an organization administering peer review programs under (1) of this subsection, to be subject to periodic evaluation by the board to assess the effectiveness of the peer review program;

require, for peer reviews under (1) of this subsection, timely submittal of peer review documents on board request; and

maintain documents collected by the board under this subsection in a manner that is designed to preserve confidentiality.

History.

(§ 12 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 27 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 16 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 17 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 18 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 19 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.430.
Expiration and renewal. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.100.]

Sec. 08.04.440.
Effect of failure to obtain license or permit.

Failure of an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity to apply for a required license or permit or to pay a required fee within (1) three years from the expiration date of the license or permit last obtained or renewed, or (2) three years from the date the person was granted a license or permit as a public accountant valid under AS

08.04.661

deprives the individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity of the right to a license or permit or renewal of a license or permit unless the board determines that the failure is excusable. In case of excusable failure, the fee for a license or permit or renewal of a license or permit under this section may not exceed three times one year’s portion of the fee that would have otherwise been required for the license, permit, or renewal.

History.

(§ 10(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 28 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 17 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 4, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, substituted “or a firm” for “, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity” following “Failure of an individual”, substituted “or firm” for “, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity” following “deprives the individual”, inserted “the department shall determine” following “excusable failure,”, deleted “may not exceed three times one year’s portion of the fee that would have otherwise been required for the license, permit, or renewal” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.440.
Effect of failure to obtain license or permit.

Failure of an individual or a firm to apply for a required license or permit or to pay a required fee within (1) three years from the expiration date of the license or permit last obtained or renewed, or (2) three years from the date the person was granted a license or permit as a public accountant valid under AS

08.04.661

deprives the individual or firm of the right to a license or permit or renewal of a license or permit unless the board determines that the failure is excusable. In case of excusable failure, the department shall determine the fee for a license or permit or renewal of a license or permit under this section.

History.

(§ 10(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 28 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 17 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 20 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.450.
Revocation or suspension of license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption.

In addition to its powers under AS

08.01.075

, the board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption, or may censure a holder of a license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption, for

fraud or deceit in obtaining a license or permit required by this chapter;

dishonesty or gross negligence in the practice of public accounting, or other acts discreditable to the accounting profession;

violation of a provision of AS

08.04.500

—

08.04.610

or failure to take corrective action to comply with AS

08.04.240(i)

within the time allowed under AS

08.04.240(j)

;

violation of a rule of professional conduct or other regulation adopted by the board;

conviction of a felony under the laws of any state or of the United States;

conviction of any crime, an essential element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of any state or of the United States;

cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew authority to practice as a certified public accountant or public accountant in any other state for any cause other than failure to pay a required fee;

suspension or revocation of the right to practice before any state or federal agency;

failure to satisfy the continuing education requirements prescribed by the board under AS

08.04.425

, except as conditioned, relaxed, or suspended by the board under AS

08.04.425

(c) and (d);

failure to satisfactorily complete a quality review requirement under AS

08.04.426

; or

committing an act in another state for which the holder of the license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption would be subject to discipline in this or the other state.

The board shall investigate a complaint made by the board of accountancy, or other regulatory body for the practice of accounting, of another state.

History.

(§ 11(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 29 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 2010; am §§ 18, 19 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of boards generally, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for license and license renewal, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 4, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “or permit,” for “or out-of-state exemption, or” following “practice privilege,” and substituted “or may require a holder of a license, practice privilege, or permit to undergo a peer review under terms required by the board or satisfactorily complete continuing education, if the board finds” for “or out-of-state exemption, for” at the end, in (a)(10), substituted “comply with the peer” for “satisfactorily complete a quality” following “failure to”, in (a)(11), substituted “commission of an act” for “committing an act” at the beginning, deleted “, or out-of-state exemption” following “permit”, added (a)(12) through (15); added (c); made stylistic changes throughout.

Sec. 08.04.450.
Revocation or suspension of license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption.

In addition to its powers under AS

08.01.075

, the board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license, practice privilege, or permit, may censure a holder of a license, practice privilege, or permit, or may require a holder of a license, practice privilege, or permit to undergo a peer review under terms required by the board or satisfactorily complete continuing education, if the board finds

fraud or deceit in obtaining a license or permit required by this chapter;

dishonesty or gross negligence in the practice of public accounting, or other acts discreditable to the accounting profession;

violation of a provision of AS

08.04.500

—

08.04.610

or failure to take corrective action to comply with AS

08.04.240(i)

within the time allowed under AS

08.04.240(j)

;

violation of a rule of professional conduct or other regulation adopted by the board;

conviction of a felony under the laws of any state or of the United States;

conviction of any crime, an essential element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of any state or of the United States;

cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew authority to practice as a certified public accountant or public accountant in any other state for any cause other than failure to pay a required fee;

suspension or revocation of the right to practice before any state or federal agency;

failure to satisfy the continuing education requirements prescribed by the board under AS

08.04.425

, except as conditioned, relaxed, or suspended by the board under AS

08.04.425

(c) and (d);

failure to comply with the peer review requirement under AS

08.04.426

;

commission of an act in another state for which the holder of the license, practice privilege, or permit would be subject to discipline in this or the other state;

dishonesty, fraud, deceit, or gross negligence by the holder of a license, practice privilege, or permit in the filing or failure to file the income tax returns of the holder of the license, practice privilege, or permit;

violation of professional standards;

performance of any fraudulent act while holding a license, practice privilege, or permit under this chapter; or

a false or misleading statement or verification provided in support of the application of another person for a license or permit under this chapter.

The board shall investigate a complaint made by the board of accountancy, or other regulatory body for the practice of accounting, of another state.

The board may require the holder of a license, practice privilege, or permit who is disciplined under (a) of this section to bear the costs of the disciplinary proceedings.

History.

(§ 11(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 29 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 2010; am §§ 18, 19 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 21 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 22 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.460.
Suspension or revocation of license revokes permit. [Repealed, § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 08.04.470.
Revocation of permit of partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity.

The board shall revoke the permit of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity if at any time it does not meet the qualifications prescribed by the sections of this chapter under which it qualified for the permit.

History.

(§ 12(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 30 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, rewrote the section, which read, “The board shall revoke the permit of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity if at any time it does not meet the qualifications prescribed by the sections of this chapter under which it qualified for the permit”.

Sec. 08.04.470.
Revocation ofa firmpermit.

The board shall revoke the permit of a firm if at any time the firm does not meet the qualifications prescribed by the sections of this chapter under which the firm qualified for the permit.

History.

(§ 12(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 30 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 23 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.480.
Grounds for censure of, or the revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew a permit for, a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity.

The board may revoke or suspend the permit of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity, may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew its permit, or may censure the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity for any of the causes enumerated in AS

08.04.450

or for any of the following additional causes:

the revocation or suspension of the license or practice privilege of a partner, a member, a shareholder, or, if the permittee is a legal entity other than a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, an owner of the permittee;

the revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the permit of a partner, a member, or a shareholder, or, if the permittee is a legal entity other than a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, an owner of the permittee;

the cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority of the partnership or any partner, the limited liability company or a member, the corporation or a shareholder, or the other legal entity to practice public accounting in another state for any cause other than failure to pay a required fee in that state.

History.

(§ 12(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 16 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 31 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, rewrote the section, which read, “The board may revoke or suspend the permit of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity, may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew its permit, or may censure the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity for any of the causes enumerated in AS

08.04.450

or for any of the following additional causes: (1) the revocation or suspension of the license or practice privilege of a partner, a member, a shareholder, or, if the permittee is a legal entity other than a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, an owner of the permittee; (2) The revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the permit of a partner, a member, or a shareholder, or, if the permittee is a legal entity other than a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, an owner of the permittee; (3) the cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority of the partnership or any partner, the limited liability company or a member, the corporation or a shareholder, or the other legal entity to practice public accounting in another state for any cause other than failure to pay a required fee in that state.”

Sec. 08.04.480.
Grounds for censure of, or the revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew a permit for, afirm.

The board may revoke or suspend the permit of a firm, may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew its permit, or may censure the firm for any of the causes enumerated in AS

08.04.450

or for any of the following additional causes:

the revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the license or practice privilege of an owner of a firm in this state or in another state;

the cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the permit or authority of the firm to practice public accounting in another state for any cause other than failure to pay a required fee in that state.

History.

(§ 12(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 16 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 31 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 24 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.490.
Reinstatement.

Upon application in writing and after a hearing, the board may issue a new license or allow a practice privilege to an individual whose license or practice privilege has been revoked, or may issue a new permit to a person whose permit has been revoked, or may modify the suspension of or may reissue any license, practice privilege, or permit to practice public accounting that has been revoked or suspended.

History.

(§ 14 ch 197 SLA 1960; am § 32 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 20 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Sec. 08.04.495.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for examinations, reexaminations, permits, licenses, and practice privileges.

History.

(§ 10 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 33 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 21 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.